California, session 20252026, AB2049.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7583.45.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7583.45.5. A person employed by a private patrol operator licensed pursuant to this chapter shall not may carry or use a BB device device, as defined in Section 16250 of the Penal Code, that has a safety catch or switch, only expels a nonmetal, round nonmetal projectile that is .51 or .68 caliber and weighs under 3.5 grams, expels the nonmetal, round projectile at a maximum velocity of 350 feet per second, has the capability to store at least five rounds, and has the ability to fire at least five rounds with one CO2 cartridge, unless they have completed the training described in Section 643 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations. cartridge.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.